Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1829SS (4) 91 da/ns S.F. 359 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 190B.301 Definitions. 1 As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 1. âCommercial vehicleâ means the same as defined in section 4 321.1. 5 2. a. âEvidently safe foodâ means food prepared and 6 distributed by a food dealer that a reasonable person would 7 consider safe to consume after considering all relevant 8 information regarding why the food could be considered unfit 9 or unmarketable for retail sale due to a failure to comply 10 with health and safety requirements described in any of the 11 following: 12 (1) The health and safety labeling of a package or container 13 holding the food. 14 (2) The health and safety laws of this state or a local 15 government, including a city or county. 16 b. âEvidently safe foodâ does not include food that is any 17 of the following: 18 (1) Subject to regulation under chapter 123. 19 (2) Subject to a government-issued stop order, or a 20 court-issued order of injunctive relief, that prohibits the 21 preparation, distribution, or transportation of the food. 22 3. âFoodâ means the same as defined in section 137F.1. 23 4. âFood dealerâ means any of the following: 24 a. A food establishment or food processing plant required to 25 operate pursuant to a license issued under 137F.4. 26 b. An establishment required to operate pursuant to a 27 license issued under section 189A.3. 28 c. A milk plant required to operate pursuant to a permit 29 issued under section 192.111 or 194.3A. 30 5. âIowa food bank associationâ means the same as defined in 31 section 190B.201. 32 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 190B.302 Food dealers. 33 1. Except as provided in subsection 2, a food dealer is 34 not liable for any act or omission causing injury, loss, or 35 -1- LSB 1829SS (4) 91 da/ns 1/ 5 S.F. 359 death by the human consumption of evidently safe food, if 1 the evidently safe food was donated by the food dealer to an 2 Iowa food bank association, and the food dealer had no actual 3 knowledge that the food would likely cause injury, loss, or 4 death if consumed in a normal manner. 5 2. Subsection 1 does not apply to evidently safe food that 6 is any of the following: 7 a. (1) Prepared or distributed to an Iowa food bank 8 association by a food dealer not operating pursuant to a 9 license required to be issued under section 137F.4, a license 10 required to be issued under section 189A.3, or a permit 11 required to be issued under section 192.111 or 194.3A. 12 (2) Prepared or distributed to an Iowa food bank association 13 by a food dealer whose license or permit described in 14 subparagraph (1) has been suspended. 15 b. Prepared or distributed to an Iowa food bank association 16 by a food dealer in a manner that does not meet required 17 time and temperature controls for safety to limit pathogenic 18 microorganism growth or toxin formation. 19 c. Declared to be unsafe for human consumption by the food 20 dealer. 21 d. Intentionally falsely advertised to an Iowa food bank 22 association by the food dealer. 23 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 190B.303 Owners of commercial 24 vehicles. 25 1. Except as provided in subsection 2, the owner of a 26 commercial vehicle is not liable for any act or omission 27 causing injury, loss, or death by the human consumption of 28 evidently safe food, if the costs of transporting the evidently 29 safe food was donated by the owner of the commercial vehicle to 30 an Iowa food bank association, and the owner of the commercial 31 vehicle had no actual knowledge that the food would likely 32 cause injury, loss, or death if consumed in a normal manner. 33 2. Subsection 1 does not apply to evidently safe food that 34 is any of the following: 35 -2- LSB 1829SS (4) 91 da/ns 2/ 5 S.F. 359 a. (1) Transported to an Iowa food bank association by the 1 owner of a commercial vehicle not operating pursuant to the 2 applicable license required to be issued pursuant to chapter 3 321. 4 (2) Transported to an Iowa food bank association by the 5 owner of a commercial vehicle operating pursuant to a suspended 6 license issued pursuant to chapter 321. 7 b. Transported to an Iowa food bank association by a 8 commercial vehicle owner in a manner that does not meet 9 required time and temperature controls for safety to limit 10 pathogenic microorganism growth or toxin formation. 11 c. Declared unsafe for human consumption by the owner of the 12 commercial vehicle. 13 d. Intentionally falsely advertised to the Iowa food bank 14 association by the owner of the commercial vehicle. 15 Sec. 4. DIRECTIONS TO CODE EDITOR. The Code editor is 16 directed to arrange the following into a new subchapter in 17 chapter 190B: 18 Sections 190B.301 through 190B.303. 19